Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1568.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5 of the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.637, No.329), known as the Wage Payment and Collection Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 5. Employes Who Are Separated from Payroll before Paydays.--* * *(a.1) Unused Fringe Benefits or Wage Supplements.(1) If an employer has an accrual policy:(i) The accrual policy shall be in writing.(ii) The employer shall pay an employe who separates from the employer any unused fringe benefits or wage supplements in 12345678910111213141516171819202122 accordance with the accrual policy and this section.(2) If an employer does not have an accrual policy, an employe who separates from the employer, through termination, permanent layoff, retirement, resignation or otherwise, and who, at the time of separation, has unused fringe benefits or wage supplements in the form of separation, vacation, holiday or guaranteed pay, whether earned by accrual or awarded in some other manner, shall be entitled to the full amount of the unused fringe benefits or wage supplements, which shall be due and payable in accordance with this section.(3) If the business of the employer changes ownership, the employe may agree in writing that the unused fringe benefits or wage supplements described under this subsection be carried forward and transferred to the subsequent employer.(4) This section applies to seasonal employes and temporary employes.(5) This subsection does not apply to:(i) Sick pay or other sick leave benefit, which may be used only in the event of illness or injury, unless:(A) the employer does not delineate the types of paid time off for the employe; or(B) the employer and employe have entered into a specific agreement otherwise, through a collective bargaining agreement or contract of employment, or an employer policy provides otherwise.(ii) A temporary layoff of the employe by the employer.(6) For purposes of this subsection, the term "accrual policy" means a policy regarding the payment of unused fringe benefits or wage supplements in the form of separation, vacation, holiday or guaranteed pay, whether earned by accrual 20250HB1568PN1857 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or awarded in some other manner, to an employe when the employe separates from the employer, through termination, permanent layoff, retirement, resignation or otherwise.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1568PN1857 - 3 - 12345